Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.214

Assessments for supervision of misdemeanant probationers.

Whenever a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor is placed on probation under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, and the defendant is supervised by a county probation department, the county probation department may assess and collect from the defendant for the duration of the term of supervision a monthly assessment not to exceed $100 per month. This assessment shall be paid to the agency supervising the defendant and shall be applied, along with funds appropriated by the legislature, toward the payment or part payment of the cost of supervising the defendant. The county probation department shall suspend such assessment while the defendant is being supervised by another state pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision.

[ 2022 c 29 s 5; 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 11; 2005 c 400 s 3; 1996 c 298 s 4; 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 32.]

NOTES:

Housing voucher program outcome evaluation and benefit-cost analysis—Transfer of residual funds to the general fund—2022 c 29: See notes following RCW 9.94A.729.

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Application—Effective date—2005 c 400: See notes following RCW 9.94A.74504.

Findings—Purpose—Short title—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 19: See notes following RCW 72.09.450.